Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1436
Recovery of possession limited.

A landlord may not recover or take possession of the dwelling unit by action or otherwise, including willful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of electric, gas, water, or other essential service to the tenant, except in case of abandonment, surrender, or as permitted in the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 36;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 19.